Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-259.02
School lands; adjacent to city of the first or second class; plat; contents; certification.

Such plat shall accurately describe all subdivisions of such tract or parcel of land, numbering the same by progressive numbers and giving the dimensions in length and breadth thereof, and the breadth and courses of all streets and alleys established therein, and shall be certified to by the State Surveyor.

Laws 1953, c. 259, § 2, p. 868.